dictsource/pl_rules
.group	oe
    cj) oe         OE
     j) oe (r      E
    lj) oe         E
     s) oe (r      E

.group	 ó
        ó          u
     @) ó (Cłbym_  =u
     @) ó (Cłbyś_  =u
     @) ó (Cłby_   =u

.group	 p
        p          p
        ph         f

   _ko) pi (A      pj
_fotoko) pi (A     pj

     _) ppł (k     pOtpuwkOvni
     _) ppł (c     pOtpuwkOvni
     _) pł (k      puwkOvni
     _) pł (c      puwkOvni

     _) python     pajtOn

.group	 q
        q          k
        qu (A      kv

.group	 r
        r          R
    A_) r (A       R
     K) r (A       R
        ri (A      Rj
     _) requeście (_ RikwES;ts;E
     _) request (A RikwEst
     _) request    RikwEst
        r (zi      R
     A) r (zł      R
    ma) r (zn      R
    ma) r (zlin    R
 _zama) r (za      R
  _zma) r (za      R
  odma) r (za      R
   _bo) r (zoj     R

        ry' (e     R

.group rz
        rz         Z
        rz (_      S
        rz (and    Rts
   _mu) rz (asichl Rz
   _mu) rz (o_+++  Rz
   _mu) rz (owie_+++ Rz
   _mu) rz (ą_+++  Rz
   _mu) rz (y_+++  Rz
   _mu) rz (ę_+++  Rz
   _mu) rz (a_+++  Rz
   _mu) rz (ów_+++ Rz
   _mu) rz (ami_+++ Rz
   _mu) rz (ach_+++ Rz
   _mi) rz (o_+++  Rz
   _mi) rz (owie_+++ Rz
   _mi) rz (ą_+++  Rz
   _mi) rz (y_+++  Rz
   _mi) rz (ę_+++  Rz
   _mi) rz (a_+++  Rz
   _mi) rz (ów_+++ Rz
   _mi) rz (ami_+++ Rz
   _mi) rz (ach_+++ Rz
     c) rz (A      S
     ć) rz (A      S
    cz) rz (A      S
     f) rz (A      S
     h) rz         S
     k) rz         S
     p) rz         S
     s) rz (A      S
     ś) rz (A      S
    sz) rz (A      S
     t) rz         S
     A) rz (my_    S
        rz (inL04_  Rts
        rz (onL04_  Rts

       
.group	 s

     @) son (_S3t  sOn
     @) sen (_S3t  sEn
_salce) son (_++   =sOn
 _pati) son (_++   =sOn

     _) sea (n_    SO
     _) sea (nowi_ SO
     _) sea (nem_  SO
     _) sea (nie_  SO
     _) sea (nu_   SO
     _) sea (na_   SO
        spacie (_  spEjS;E
        space'ie (_ spEjS;E
        space      spEjs
     _) standup    stEndap
     y) stein      stEin
        stein (_S5t Stajn
        stein      Stajn
        s          s
  _qua) s (i       z

        s (i       S;
        sz         S

        skj (A     S

.group sc
        sch        S
    pa) sch (a     sx
        sch (abA_  sx
        sch (ab_   sx
        sch (abami_ sx
        sch (abem_ sx
        sch (abie_ sx
        sch (abom  sx
        sch (abosz sx
        sch (abowA sx
        sch (abó   sx
        sch (adzA  sx
        sch (adzk  sx
        sch (am_   sx
        sch (ami   sx
        sch (amiA  sx
        sch (arakt sx
     e) sch (ato   sx
        sch (edA   sx
        sch (ed_   sx
        sch (emat  sx
        scherz     skERts
     _) sch (ety   sx
     _) sch (etyn  sx
        sch (izmA  sx
        sch (izm_  sx
        sch (izo   sx
        sch (lali  sx
        sch (lanA  sx
        sch (lać   sx
        sch (lał   sx
     _) sch (leb_  sx
     _) sch (lebi  sx
        sch (leli  sx
        sch (ludnA sx
        sch (nie_  sx
        sch (nię   sx
        sch (ną    sx
        sch (nę    sx
    _w) sch (od    sx
        sch (odach_ sx
        sch (odami_ sx
        sch (odek_ sx
        sch (odka  sx
        sch (odki  sx
        sch (odkiem_ sx
        sch (odkow sx
        sch (odkowi_ sx
        sch (odku_ sx
        sch (odkó  sx
        sch (odow  sx
        sch (ody_  sx
        sch (odzi  sx
        sch (odzą  sx
        sch (odzę  sx
        sch (odó   sx
        schoe      SE
        sch (orowa sx
        sch (orze  sx
        sch (owA   sx
        sch (owa   sx
        sch (ronA  sx
        sch (ron_  sx
        sch (rup_  sx
        sch (rupali sx
        sch (rupanA sx
        sch (rupać_ sx
        sch (rupał sx
        sch (rupiA sx
        sch (rypA  sx
        sch (rypl  sx
        sch (rypł  sx
        sch (rzA   sx
        sch (udn   sx
        schwarz    SvaRts
        sch (wyci  sx
        sch (wytA  sx
        sch (ylA   sx
     _) sch (yl_   sx
        sch (ył    sx
        sch (ó     sx
        sch (ą     sx
        sch (ę     sx
        sch (ł     sx

.group sh
   _ek) sh         sx
   _dy) sh         sx
   _fi) sh (armon  sx
        sh         S
        shire      SajER

.group si
        si (A      S;
_anasta) si (L03_  sj
  _mak) si (_      si
  plek) si (_      si
        si (b      si
        si (brz    S;i
        si (c      si
        si (cA     S;i
        si (ch     S;i
        si (cz     S;i
        si (d      si
        si (dlA    S;i
        si (dl_    S;i
        si (dł     S;i
        si (f      si
        si (g      si
    du) si (gr     S;i
        si (h      si
        si (liko   si
        si (ll     si
        si (los    si
        si (lv     si
        si (m      si
     s) si (ma_    =i
     s) si (mem_   =i
     s) si (mie_   =i
     s) si (mo_    =i
        si (ng     si
        si (nus    si
        si (q      si
        si (r      si
        si (t      si
     _) si (tA     S;i
     _) si (t_     S;i
     _) si (tk     S;i
        si (v      si
        si (x      si


.group	 ś
        ś          S;
        ść (dzie   Z;

.group	 t
        t          t
        t (i       t;
        ti (A      tj
     _) tickecie (_ t;ikEts;E
     _) ticket     t;ikEt
        t (rz      t|
        t (s       t|
        town (_S4t tawn
        tthew      sju
        tz (ł      tz
        tz         ts

.group	 th
    _e) th (anak   t
     _) the (_     dE
        th         s
        th (ie_    s;
     _) th         t
     _) thank      fENk
        thew       fju

     _) thunderbi (rd fEndERbE


.group	 u
        u          u
        u (_A      u_
     a) u          w
     e) u          w
    na) u (k       u
    na) u (cz      u
   _za) u (to      w
   _za) u          u
  para) u          u
  meta) u          u
    Ce) u (s       u
  _nie) u          u
 _prze) u          u
    Ce) u (m_      u
     @) u (łbym_   =u
     @) u (łbyś_   =u
     @) u (łby_    =u
   _bl) uetooth    utuf

    _m) usic (al_  j'uzik
    _m) usic (al   juzik
     t) ube (_     up
    _b) uick       wik
    _l) unch       antS

.group	 v
        v          v
     f) v (A       f
     h) v (A       f
     k) v (A       f
     p) v (A       f
     s) v (A       f
     t) v (A       f
        v (olks    f
        ville (_S5t vil
     _) vice (@P4t witsE
        visor      v'ajzOR
        vised      v'ajst
     _) vram       vi_Ram

.group	 w
        w          v
        w (sk      _v
   ier) wsz (A     fS
        w (_       f
   L02) w (A       f
  L02r) w (A       f

     _) w (_c      f
     _) w (_fA     v
     _) w (_fC     vE
     _) w (_wA     v
     _) w (_wC     vE
     _) w (_h      f
     _) w (_k      f
     _) w (_p      f
     _) w (_s      f
     _) w (_t      f
     _) w (_       v

     _) wh (isper  w
     _) wice (@P4t vitsE
     _) window     windOw
        wee (k     wi
     _) washi      wOSi
        wrigh      Raj
     C) wrigh      Raj


.group	 x
        x          ks
        xie        kS;E

.group	 y
        y          y
        y (_A      y_
     _) y (A       j
     A) y (A       j
     A) y (_       j
  _pat) y (++      y
     _) you (n     ja
     _) you        ju

     r) y' (emu_ 
     r) y' (ego_ 
     C) y' (emu_   ;
     C) y' (ego_   ;

_histor) y (ka++   y
_histor) y (kom++  y
 _tetr) y (ka++    y
 _tetr) y (kom++   y

   _et) y (L01_    =y
 _kryt) y (L01_    =y
_prakt) y (L01_    =y
 _klas) y (L01_    =y
 _mist) y (L01     =y
 _stat) y (L01_    =y
  @aet) y (L01_    =y
  @akt) y (L01_    =y
  @ald) y (L01_    =y
  @alt) y (L01_    =y
  @ant) y (L01_    =y
  @ast) y (L01_    =y
  @aut) y (L01_    =y
  @bat) y (L01_    =y
  @bot) y (L01_    =y
  @cet) y (L01_    =y
  @det) y (L01_    =y
  @eks) y (L01_    =y
  @ekt) y (L01_    =y
  @ent) y (L01_    =y
  @ept) y (L01_    =y
  @est) y (L01_    =y
  @etr) y (L01_    =y
  @eut) y (L01_    =y
   fiz) y (L01_    =y
  @for) y (L01_    =y
  @get) y (L01_    =y
  @gor) y (L01_    =y
  @het) y (L01_    =y
  @iat) y (L01_    =y
  @iot) y (L01_    =y
  @ipt) y (L01_    =y
  @ist) y (L01_    =y
  @ktr) y (L01_    =y
  @las) y (L01_    =y
  @let) y (L01_    =y
  @lit) y (L01_    =y
  @lod) y (L01_    =y
  @mat) y (L01_    =y
  @mer) y (L01_    =y
  @met) y (L01_    =y
  @net) y (L01_    =y
  @nez) y (L01_    =y
  @not) y (L01_    =y
  @oet) y (L01_    =y
   opt) y (L01_    =y
  @ord) y (L01_    =y
  @ost) y (L01_    =y
  @ptr) y (L01_    =y
  @rat) y (L01_    =y
  @ret) y (L01_    =y
  @rkt) y (L01_    =y
  @rot) y (L01_    =y
  @ryt) y (L01_    =y
  @tat) y (L01_    =y
  @ter) y (L01_    =y
  @tet) y (L01_    =y
  @tod) y (L01_    =y
  @tor) y (L01_    =y
  @ust) y (L01_    =y
  @yst) y (L01_    =y
  @zot) y (L01_    =y

    @ł) y (byśmy_  =y
    @ł) y (byście_ =y
    @ł) y (by_     =y

    eb) y (śmy_    =y
    eb) y (ście_   =y
   _ab) y (ście_   =y
   _ab) y (śmy_    =y
     @) y (łbym_   =y
     @) y (łbyś_   =y
     @) y (łby_    =y

.group	 z
        z          z
        z (_       s
        z (i       Z;
        zi (A      Z;
     _) zi (p      Z;i
        zi (k      Z;i
        zi (m+     Z;i
     _) zi (C      z_i
  _nie) zi (C      z_i
        zi (C      zi

     _) z (_c      s
     _) z (_sA     s
     _) z (_sC     zE
     _) z (_śA     s
     _) z (_śC     zE
     _) z (_zA     s
     _) z (_zC     zE
     _) z (_źA     s
     _) z (_źC     zE
     _) z (_żA     s
     _) z (_żC     zE
     _) z (_f      s
     _) z (_h      s
     _) z (_k      s
     _) z (_p      s
     _) z (_s      s
     _) z (_t      s
     _) z (_       z

    mo) zi (ll     zi
   _ro) z (iC      z
     _) zuri (ch   tsuRy
        z (inL04_   ts

.group zz
     _) zz (a_     z_z
        zz (a_     ts
papara) zz (i      ts
        zz (anL04_  ts
        zz (inL04_  ts
        zz (onL04_  ts
        zz (ami_   ts
        zz (ach_   ts
        zz (ów_    ts
        zz (y_     ts
        zz (ę_     ts
        zz (o_     ts
   _pi) zz         ts
   _mA) zz (A      ts


.group	 ź
        ź          Z;
        ź (_       S;

.group	 ż
        ż          Z
        ż (_       S
     A) ż (my_     S


.group	 ñ
        ñ (A       n^;
        ñ          n^

.group	í
        í (A       ij
        í          i

.group
	~              // ? ignore ~
        å          O
        æ          E
        ä          E
        ø          E
        ö          E
        ü          i
        č          tS
        ř          Z
        š          S
        ž          Z

        'a (_S2    a
        'owi (_S4  Ovi
        'em (_S3   Em
        'u (_S2    u
        'ego (_S4  EgO
        'emu (_S4  Emu
